Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.220

Alienation by defendant, effect of.

An action for the recovery of the possession of real property against a person in possession, cannot be prejudiced by any alienation made by such person either before or after the commencement of the action; but if such alienation be made after the commencement of the action, and the defendant do not satisfy the judgment recovered for damages for withholding the possession, such damages may be recovered by action against the purchaser.

[Code 1881 s 545; 1877 p 114 s 549; 1869 p 130 s 497; RRS s 803.]